test/src/morphology/V-suenduemae69_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `sündümä: # Verb (69) `sündümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `sündümä+V+Inf/mA: `sündümä
     `sündümä+V+Inf: `sündüdäq
     `sündümä+V+ActPrtPrc: `sündünüq
     `sündümä+V+PssPrtPrc: sünnüt
     `sündümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: sünnü
     `sündümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: sünnüs
     `sündümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `sündü
     `sündümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `sündü
